Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2528.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Brown Brothers Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Brown brothers, Stewart, Homer, Grant, Dell and Everett, grew up in Nicktown, Pennsylvania, and all attended the Griffith School in Nicktown.(2) Stewart Brown was born in 1906 and operated a garage in Nicktown. He later lived in Michigan and had one child. He enlisted in the Army in 1943, served as an Army Technical Sergeant and passed away in 1961.(3) Homer Brown was born in 1913 and worked as a mechanic. He lived near Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, and had two children. He entered the Army in 1943, served as an Army 12345678910111213141516171819 Artillery Sergeant in Italy and passed away in 1960.(4) Grant Brown was born in 1914 and worked on a family farm and as a mechanic. He lived in Ohio and was married twice. He entered the Army in 1942, served as an Army Sergeant in France and passed away in 1967.(5) Dell Brown was born in 1917 and worked as a lumberman, in shaft and slope mining and for Bell Telephone. He lived in Nicktown, married and had six children. He entered the Army in 1942, served as an Army Technical Sergeant in the Medical Corps in Italy, Sicily and North Africa and passed away in 1987.(6) Everett Brown was born in 1918 and worked as a machinist for the Pennsylvania Railroad. He lived near Pittsburgh, married and had four children. He entered the Army in 1943, served as an Army Air Force Sergeant in England and passed away in 1970.(7) Collectively, the five Brown brothers served in the United States Army during World War II across multiple theaters, including Italy, France, England, Sicily and North Africa.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 8514, carrying Pennsylvania Route 271 over North Branch Blacklick Creek in Barr Township, Cambria County, is designated as the Brown Brothers Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2528PN3427 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829